Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 1 General Provisions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

27 Am. Jur. 2d Employment Relationship § 1 et seq.; 48 Am. Jur. 2d Labor and Labor Relations § 1 et seq.

Loaned servant doctrine under Federal Employers' Liability or Safety Appliance Act, 1 ALR2d 302.

Existence of master-servant relation where operator is furnished with leased machine, 17 ALR2d 1388.

Right of employer to terminate contract because of employee's illness or physical incapacity, 21 ALR2d 1247.

Nonprofit charitable institutions as within operation of labor statutes, 26 ALR2d 1020.

Failure to furnish assistance to employee as affecting liability for injury or death, 36 ALR2d 8.

Employee's rights with respect to compensation or bonus where he continues in employer's service after expiration of contract for definite term; quantum meruit recovery, 53 ALR2d 384.

Employer's right of action against third person tortiously killing or injuring employee, 57 ALR2d 802.

Application and effect of “shop right rule” or license giving employer limited rights in employees' inventions and discoveries, 61 ALR2d 356.

Employer's damages for breach of employment contract by employee's terminating employment, 61 ALR2d 1008.

Master's liability for servant's injury or death caused in whole or in part by act of God, 62 ALR2d 796.

Master's duty to care for or to furnish medical aid to servant stricken by illness, 64 ALR2d 1108.

Mining grubstake agreements distinguished from employment contracts, 70 ALR2d 904.

Liability of master for injury or death of servant on master's premises where injury occurred outside working hours, 76 ALR2d 1215.

Liability for injury from overhead door, 83 ALR2d 743.

Enforceability, under statute of frauds provision as to contracts not to be performed within a year, of oral employment contract for more than one year but specifically made terminable upon death of either party, 88 ALR2d 701.

Effect of attempt to terminate employment upon shorter notice than that stipulated in contract, 96 ALR2d 272.

Provision in employment contract requiring written notice before instituting action, 4 ALR3d 439.

Validity of individual employment contract for specific term which contains provision that employee will perform if physically able, if health permits or the like, 7 ALR3d 898.

Employer's liability to employee for malpractice of physician supplied by employer, 16 ALR3d 564.

Employer's misrepresentations as to employee's or agent's future earnings as actionable fraud, 16 ALR3d 1311.

Liability for inducing employee not engaged for definite term to move to competitor, 24 ALR3d 821.

Measure of damages for fraudulently inducing employment contract, 24 ALR3d 1388.

Employer's misrepresentation as to prospect or duration of employment as actionable fraud, 24 ALR3d 1412.

Liability, under Federal Employers' Liability Act [45 U.S.C. § 51 et seq.], for industrial or occupational poisoning, 30 ALR3d 735.

Judgment in action on express contract for labor or services as precluding, as a matter of res judicata, subsequent action on implied contract (quantum meruit) or vice versa, 35 ALR3d 874.

Rights and obligations under employer-employee suggestion plans, 40 ALR3d 1416.

Employer's liability for theft or disappearance of employee's property left at the place of employment, 46 ALR3d 1306.

Modern status as to duration of employment where contract specifies no term but fixes daily or longer compensation, 93 ALR3d 659.

Validity, construction and application of regulation regarding outside employment of governmental employees or officers, 94 ALR3d 1230.

Liability for interference with invalid or unenforceable contract, 96 ALR3d 1294.

Modern status of law regarding solicitation of business by or for attorney, 5 ALR4th 866.

Proper measure and elements of damages for misappropriation of trade secret, 11 ALR4th 12.

Validity and construction of statute prohibiting employers from suggesting or requiring polygraph or similar tests as condition of employment or continued employment, 23 ALR4th 187.

Right to discharge allegedly “at-will” employee as affected by employer's promulgation of employment policies as to discharge, 33 ALR4th 120.

Vacation pay rights of private employees not covered by collective labor contract, 33 ALR4th 264.

Validity and enforceability of provision that employer shall be liable for stipulated damages on breach of employment contract, 40 ALR4th 285.

Liability for discharge of at-will employee for refusal to submit to drug testing, 79 ALR4th 105.

Employer's state-law liability for withdrawing, or substantially altering, job offer for indefinite period before employee actually commences employment, 1 ALR5th 401.

Effectiveness of employer's disclaimer of representations in personnel manual or employee handbook altering at-will employment relationship, 17 ALR5th 1.

Employer's liability to employee or agent for injury or death resulting from assault or criminal attack by third person, 40 ALR5th 1.

Validity, construction, and application of regulations regarding outside employment of governmental employees or officers, 62 ALR5th 671.

Availability of private right of action under § 503 of Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 USCS § 793), providing that certain federal contracts must contain provision requiring affirmative action to employ qualified handicapped individuals, 60 ALR Fed 329.

Applicability of doctrine of equitable estoppel to revocation of job appointment by agency of federal government, 73 ALR Fed 399.

When are separate business entities “joint employers” of same employees for purposes of application of federal labor laws, 73 ALR Fed 609.

30 C.J.S. Employer — Employee Relationship § 1 et seq.; 47B C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 579 to 584; 51 C.J.S. Labor Relations § 1 et seq.

§ 27-1-101.
“Manufacturing establishment” defined; “person” defined.

Manufacturing establishments, as those words are used in this act [§§

27-1-101

through

27-1-104

,

27-1-108

,

27-1-109

,

27-2-104

,

27-2-105

,

27-2-108

,

27-2-109

], shall mean and include all smelters, oil refineries, cement works, mills of every kind, machine and repair shops, and in addition to the foregoing, any other kind or character of manufacturing establishment, of any nature or description whatsoever, wherein any natural product or other articles or materials of any kind, in a raw or unfinished or incomplete state or condition, are converted into a new or improved or different form. Wherever the expression occurs in this act in substantially the following words: “every person owning or operating any manufacturing establishment,” or where language similar to that is used, the word “person” in that connection shall be held and construed to mean any person or persons, partnership, corporation, receiver, trust, trustee, or any other person or combination of persons, either natural or artificial, by whatever name he or they may be called.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 268; R.S. 1931, § 109-1208; C.S. 1945, § 54-309; W.S. 1957, § 27-1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” as used in this section, apparently refers to Laws 1917, ch. 113, which appears as §§

27-1-101

through

27-1-104

,

27-1-108

,

27-1-109

,

27-2-104

,

27-2-105

,

27-2-108

and

27-2-109

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Reasonableness of qualifications for Union Office under § 401(e) of Labor-Management Reporting and Disclosure Act (29 U.S.C. § 481(e), 147 ALR Fed 389.

§ 27-1-102.
Doors at public places to open outward; handrails on stairs; enforcement.

All doors leading into or to any manufacturing establishment, mills, workshops, offices, bakeries, laundries, stores, hotels, theaters, halls, or other buildings in which people are employed, shall be so constructed as to open outward, when practicable, and shall not be locked, bolted or fastened so as to prevent free egress during working hours. Proper and substantial handrails shall be provided on all stairways in manufacturing establishments, mills, workshops, offices, bakeries, laundries, stores, hotels, theaters, halls, and other buildings where people are employed or rooms are rented to the public. The department of workforce services shall have authority to enforce by due process of law, the provisions of this section, and other laws relating to fire escapes.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 266; R.S. 1931, § 109-1206; C.S. 1945, § 54-307; W.S. 1957, § 27-2; 2014 ch. 79, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in the last sentence, substituted “The department of workforce services” for “And he.”

Laws 2014, ch. 79, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

The reference in the last sentence to “he” appears to be a reference to the commissioner of labor and statistics, as established in former §

27-2-101

. For present provisions relating to duties of department of employment, see §

27-2-104

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injuries in connection with revolving door on nonresidential premises, 93 ALR3d 132.

§ 27-1-103.
Safety devices on elevators and machinery.

The openings of all hoistways, hatchways, elevators, well holes and stairways in manufacturing establishments, mills, workshops, bakeries, laundries, stores, hotels, theaters, halls, or any other kind of establishment where labor is employed, or machinery used, shall be protected by trapdoors, hatches, fences, automatic gates or other safeguards, and all due diligence shall be used to keep all such means of protection closed, except when it is necessary to have the same open for use when practicable. All machinery, in use in any mercantile, manufacturing, or any other establishment whatsoever where labor is employed, shall be equipped, with proper shifters for throwing on or off pulleys, loose pulleys and other such safeguards as may be deemed necessary by the department of workforce services for the proper safeguard of life and limb.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 267; R.S. 1931, § 109-1207; C.S. 1945, § 54-308; W.S. 1957, § 27-3; 2014 ch. 79, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in the last sentence, substituted “department of workforce services” for “commissioner of labor.”

Laws 2014, ch. 79, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

The reference in the last sentence to the “commissioner of labor” was probably intended to be to the commissioner of labor and statistics, as established in former §

27-2-101

. For present provisions relating to duties of department of employment, see §

27-2-104

.

§ 27-1-104.
Mines and interstate railroads exempt.

Nothing herein contained, as applied to inspection and application of safety devices, shall be construed to be applicable to coal and metalliferous mines and workshops connected therewith, nor to railroads engaged in interstate commerce and workshops connected therewith.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 17; C.S. 1920, § 277; R.S. 1931, § 109-1217; Laws 1933, ch. 116, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 54-318; W.S. 1957, § 27-4.

Cross references. —

As to safety regulations in mining operations generally, see §§

30-2-101

through

30-3-509

.

As to railroads generally, see §§

37-9-101

through

37-10-105

.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 18, ch. 113, Laws 1917, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 27-1-105.
Employees' contract releasing employer from personal injury liability void.

It shall be unlawful for any person, company or corporation to require of its servants or employees, as a condition of their employment or otherwise, any contract or agreement whereby such person, company or corporation shall be released or discharged from liability or responsibility on account of personal injuries received by such servants or employees while in service of such person, company or corporation, by reason of the negligence of such person, company or corporation, or the agents or employees thereof, and such contracts shall be absolutely null and void.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 28, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2522; C.S. 1910, § 3430; C.S. 1920, § 4306; R.S. 1931, § 63-123; C.S. 1945, § 54-901; W.S. 1957, § 27-5.

Cross references. —

For provision that agreements to waive, assign, etc., benefits under unemployment compensation shall be void and providing a penalty therefor, see §§

27-3-319

and

27-3-701

.

For provision prohibiting contracts, rules, regulations, etc., restricting liability under worker's compensation law, see § 27-14-104(b).

For constitutional provision that no law shall be enacted limiting the amount of damages to be recovered for causing the injury or death of any person, and providing that any contract or agreement with any employee waiving any right to recover damages for causing the death or injury of any employee shall be void, see art. 10, § 4, Wyo. Const.

For provision prohibiting contracts exempting employer from liability for personal injuries, see art. 19, § 7, Wyo. Const.

Stipulation as to amount of benefits payable by employer heldvalid. —

A stipulation entered into between an employee and his employer settling the amount of worker's compensation benefits the employer would pay for the employee's injury was valid. In re Injury to Lea, 707 P.2d 754,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 592

(Wyo. 1985).

Agreement to submit disputes concerning injury and workers'compensation benefits to arbitration. —

Employee's agreement to submit disputes concerning injury and workers' compensation benefits to arbitration was not unenforceable under constitutional provision or statute, where there was no evidence that employer conditioned employment on employee's assent to any release of liability, and employer in fact accepted liability for employee's injuries through its workers' compensation plan. Gibson v. Wal-Mart Stores, Inc., 181 F.3d 1163, 1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 14114 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1999).

Welder controlled by employer deemed employee, although designatedby document as independent contractor. —

Where claimant was a rig welder — meaning that he had a truck unit welder and hired out within the oil patch industry on an hourly basis for himself and his truck, which supplied all equipment required to perform general welding services —, he was engaged in some prefabrication and assembly completed in the general contractor's yard prior to field installation (after welding-skill testing by the owner) when injured, and the general contractor attempted to treat him differently than it did other employees with respect to federal income tax withholding, federal social security, unemployment, worker's compensation, health insurance and retirement plans, but in all other aspects he was subject to the same kind of control as any other employee, the trial court's decision that he was a covered employee was affirmed, although a document designated him as an independent contractor. Flint Eng'g & Constr. Co. v. Richardson, 726 P.2d 511,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 624

(Wyo. 1986).

Applied

in

Herring v. Welltech, Inc., 715 P.2d 553,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 509

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes duress by employer or former employer vitiating employee's release of employer from claims arising out of employment, 30 ALR4th 294.

Landlord's tort liability to tenant for personal injury or property damage resulting from criminal conduct of employee, 38 ALR4th 240.

Apportionment of liability between landowners and assailants for injuries to crime victims, 54 ALR5th 379.

§ 27-1-106.
Certain nonresident employers required to post bond; exceptions.

All firms, corporations or employers of any kind who are nonresident employers and expect to pay wages in the state of Wyoming in excess of four thousand dollars ($4,000.00) in any month as a result of conducting business within Wyoming, are required to file with the director of the department of workforce services a surety bond or other security meeting the requirements of this section, approved by the director.

The bond or other security required by subsection (a) of this section shall be in the amount of eight thousand dollars ($8,000.00) plus an additional two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) for each one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or fraction thereof that the expected wages in any month exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000.00) up to expected wages in any month of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00). For expected wages in any month that exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00), the bond or other security amount shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each additional one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or fraction thereof of expected wages.

The bond or security provided for in this section shall ensure:

The payment of wages of employees working in the state;

The payment of civil penalties the occupational health and safety commission may assess; and

All other payments or obligations of the nonresident employer required by:

The Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act unless waived by the director pursuant to W.S.

27-14-302

;

Any other section under title 27 of Wyoming statutes or any department of workforce services rule or regulation.

The nonresident employer shall post additional security before performing work under any new contract if the security previously posted under this section has expired.

Upon application by a nonresident employer, the director may permit the withdrawal of any security if the employer has:

Complied with the security requirements of this section and made all necessary payments for a period of two (2) years;

Demonstrated that he has been a resident of the state for two (2) years and intends to remain a resident; or

Acquired real property as a nonresident with an unencumbered value greater than or equal to the value of the bond or other security required by subsection (b) of this section.

If the anticipated work has ceased before the expiration of twenty-four (24) months, or less than fifty percent (50%) of the largest work force is still working in Wyoming, the security deposited by the nonresident employer shall be forfeited and retained by the division in an amount equal to the reserved amounts for compensable injuries to the nonresident employer’s employees. Upon application by a nonresident employer, the division shall refund the amount not forfeited pursuant to this subsection except for any disbursements made under subsection (c) of this section.

This section does not apply to charitable or religious organizations.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 221, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-6; Laws 1961, ch. 151, § 1; 1967, ch. 30, § 1; 1989, ch. 122, § 1; 1991, ch. 93, § 1; 1993, ch. 163, § 1; 2006, ch. 2, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2017 ch. 71, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 39, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to nonresident employers with respect to worker's compensation law, see art. 3 of ch. 14 of this title.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added “unless waived by the director pursuant to W.S.

27-14-302

.” in (c)(ii).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) plus an additional two thousand dollars ($2,000.00)” for “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) plus an additional one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)”; added (c)(ii); renumbered former (c)(ii) as (c)(iii); added (c)(iii)(A) and (c)(iii)(B); and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “four thousand dollars ($4,000.00) in any month” for “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) monthly or one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000.00) annually” and deleted “and the attorney general” at the end; and in (b), substituted “eight thousand dollars ($8,000.00)” for “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00),” “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000.00),” and “in any month exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000.00) up to expected wages in any month of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00)" for "wages exceed one hundred twenty thousand dollars (120,000.00)," and added the last sentence.

§ 27-1-107.
Nonresident employers to post bond; penalty.

Any person or persons, corporation, agent, manager or employer who shall violate or fail to comply with any of the provisions of W.S.

27-1-106

shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall for each offense, be subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 221,§ 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-7; Laws 1989, ch. 122, § 1; 2017 ch. 71, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added “or fail to comply with” following “violate”, and substituted “one thousand dollars ($1000.00)” for “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).”

§ 27-1-108.
Penalties generally.

Any person who violates or omits to comply with any of the provisions of this act, or any final order of the department of workforce services is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 16; C.S. 1920, § 276; R.S. 1931, § 109-1216; C.S. 1945, § 54-317; W.S. 1957, § 27-8; Laws 1989, ch. 122, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” as used in this section, apparently refers to Laws 1917, ch. 113, which appears as §§

27-1-101

through

27-1-104

,

27-1-108

,

27-1-109

,

27-2-104

,

27-2-105

,

27-2-108

and

27-2-109

.

§ 27-1-109.
Prosecution of violations.

The district attorney for any county in this state shall, upon receipt of a verified complaint from the director of the department of workforce services or a final agency decision of the department of workforce services prosecute to termination before any court of competent jurisdiction, in the name of the state of Wyoming, actions or proceedings against any person or persons charged with violation of any of the provisions of this act, or any of the laws of this state enacted for the protection of employees.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 113, § 11; C.S. 1920, § 271; R.S. 1931, § 109-1211; C.S. 1945, § 54-312; W.S. 1957, § 27-9; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” twice.

§ 27-1-110.
State rehabilitation council; membership; chairman.

There is established a permanent council within the department of workforce services to be known as the Wyoming governor’s state rehabilitation council, to consist of:

At least one (1) representative of the statewide independent living council;

At least one (1) representative of a parent training and information center;

At least one (1) representative of the client assistance program;

At least one (1) vocational rehabilitative counselor;

At least one (1) representative of community rehabilitation program service providers;

Four (4) representatives of business, industry and labor;

At least two (2) representatives of disability advocacy groups;

At least two (2) current or former applicants of vocational rehabilitation services;

The administrator of the division of vocational rehabilitation;

At least one (1) representative of the department of education;

At least one (1) representative of the state workforce investment board.

The director of the department of workforce services shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member of the state rehabilitation council.

A majority of council members shall be persons who are:

Individuals with disabilities;

Not employed by the division of vocational rehabilitation.

One (1) of the members shall be elected chairman by the members of the council. The appointive members shall hold office for the term specified. The council shall be nonpartisan. The governor may remove any council member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-9.1; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2010, ch. 65, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to education of the handicapped, see §§

21-2-501

,

21-2-502

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, rewrote (a); and added (b) and (c).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch. 65, § 2, provides:

“(a) It is the intention and direction of the legislature that:

“(i) All duties of the governor's office with respect to the Serve Wyoming, governor's council for employment and rehabilitation of the handicapped and the displaced worker and education programs be transferred to the department of workforce services;

“(ii) All unexpended funds not otherwise obligated and any other property, if any, of the governor's office exclusively dedicated to the Serve Wyoming, governor's council for employment and rehabilitation of the handicapped and the displaced worker and education programs be transferred to the department of workforce services;

“(iii) Any contract, agreement or obligation entered into or assumed by the governor's office with respect to the Serve Wyoming, governor's council for employment and rehabilitation of the handicapped and the displaced worker and education programs, if the execution or assumption was within the lawful powers of the governor's office, be assumed by the department of workforce services;

“(iv) Any policy adopted by the governor's office with respect to the Serve Wyoming, governor's council for employment and rehabilitation of the handicapped and the displaced worker and education programs remain in effect unaltered as policy of the department of workforce services until amended or repealed by the department of workforce services.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes handicap under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap, 82 ALR4th 26.

When must Employer offer qualified disabled employee or applicant opportunity to change employee's workplace or work at home as means of fulfilling reasonable accommodation requirement, 133 ALR Fed 521.

§ 27-1-111.
Duties of council and department.

The department of workforce services, with advice of the council, shall carry on a continuing program to promote the employment of physically, mentally, emotionally and otherwise handicapped persons by creating statewide interest in the rehabilitation and employment of the handicapped and by obtaining and maintaining cooperation from all public and private groups and individuals in the field. The council shall work in cooperation with the president’s committee on employment of the handicapped in order to more effectively carry out the purposes of this act [§§

27-1-110

through

27-1-112

].

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 135, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-9.2; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2010, ch. 65, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “department of workforce services” for “department of employment.”

§ 27-1-112.
Authority of council to receive gifts, grants or donations.

The department of workforce services, on behalf of the council, is authorized to receive any gifts, grants or donations made for any of the purposes of its program.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 135, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 27-9.3; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2010, ch. 65, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “department of workforce services” for “department of employment.”

§ 27-1-113.
Employer immunity for disclosure of certain employee information; rebuttal of presumption.

An employer who discloses information about a former employee’s job performance to a prospective employer or to an employer of the former employee is presumed to be acting in good faith. Unless lack of good faith is shown by a preponderance of evidence, the employer is immune from civil liability for the disclosure or for the consequences resulting from the disclosure.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, the presumption of good faith is rebutted upon a showing that the information disclosed by the former employer was knowingly false or deliberately misleading or was rendered with malicious purpose.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 108, § 1.

§ 27-1-114.
Temporary employment fees.

A temporary service contractor for temporary workers is not entitled to collect a fee from an employer for the permanent employment of a temporary worker placed by the temporary service contractor, unless the employer is notified in writing of the existence and the amount of the fee prior to the date of services being rendered by a temporary worker to the employer.

For the purpose of this section “temporary service contractor” means any person, firm, association or corporation conducting a business that employs individuals directly for the purpose of furnishing services of the employed individuals on a temporary basis to others.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 9, § 1.

§ 27-1-115.
State directory of new hires; requirements; exceptions; definitions.

A department designated by the governor shall maintain a directory of new hires using information provided by employers in the state. The department shall use the information in the directory of new hires to:

Provide information to the department of family services as necessary to:

Locate individuals for purposes of establishing paternity and establishing, modifying and enforcing child support obligations;

Notify employers of wage withholding orders.

Provide information to the national directory of new hires; and

Maintain information as necessary for the administration of employment security and worker’s compensation programs.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, each employer in the state shall furnish to the department of workforce services within twenty (20) days of hiring a new employee, or in the case of an employer transmitting reports magnetically or electronically, by two (2) monthly transmissions not less than twelve (12) days nor more than sixteen (16) days apart, a report that contains the name, address and social security number of the employee, the date services for remuneration were first performed by the employee and the name and address of, and identifying number assigned to, the employer under section 6109 of the Internal Revenue Code. The report shall be made on a W-4 form approved by the internal revenue service or, at the option of the employer, on an equivalent form approved by the department. The form may be transmitted by first class mail, electronically or magnetically in a format acceptable to the designated department.

An employer that has employees who are employed in Wyoming and any other state and who transmits the report required under subsection (b) of this section by electronic or magnetic means may elect to submit the report to either state in accordance with federal law. Any department, agency or instrumentality of the federal government operating in the state may submit the report required under subsection (b) of this section to the national directory of new hires in accordance with federal law.

For purposes of this section:

“Employee” means an individual eighteen (18) years of age or older who is an employee within the meaning of chapter 24 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, but does not include an employee of a federal or state agency performing intelligence or counter-intelligence functions if the head of such agency has determined that reporting the information required by this section could endanger the safety of the individual or compromise an ongoing investigation or intelligence operation. If the federal government seeks to impose sanctions on Wyoming for failure to report new hires under eighteen (18) years of age, the department may include such individuals within the definition of employee for purposes of this section;

“Employer” means as defined in section 3401(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and includes any governmental agency and any labor organization;

“Newly hired employee” means an individual who has not previously been employed by the employer or was previously employed by the employer but has been separated from employment with that employer for at least sixty (60) days.

In the event that the federal law requiring the state to maintain a directory of new hires is repealed, employers shall not be required to submit reports as provided by subsections (b) and (c) of this section. The state shall not thereafter maintain the directory of new hires required under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 25, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 47, § 1.

The 2012 amendments.—

The first 2012 amendment, by ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in the first sentence of (b).

The second 2012 amendment, by ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2012, inserted “the date services for remuneration were first performed by the employee” in (b); and added (d)(iii).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 24 of the Internal Revenue Code is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3401 et seq.

§ 27-1-116.
Business relationship between franchisors and franchisees; business relationship between franchisors and employees of franchisees.

Neither a franchisee nor a franchisee’s employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisor for any purpose under this title, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the franchisor and the franchisee.

This section shall not apply to a voluntary agreement entered into between the United States department of labor and a franchisee.

As used in this section, “franchisee” and “franchisor” have the same definitions as set out in 16 C.F.R. 436.1.

History.

2017 ch. 178, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 178, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.